Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2616
Optometry; approved schools; requirements.

No school of optometry shall be approved by the board as an accredited school unless the school is accredited by an accrediting organization which is recognized by the United States Department of Education.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 114, p. 488;

C.S.1929, § 71-1604;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,136;

Laws 1965, c. 415, § 1, p. 1325;

Laws 1979, LB 9, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 987, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 440;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,136;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 26;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 342;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 889;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 10.